test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-isda_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - isdä - do ok : # 
     isdä+V+Inf: isdä
     isdä+V+Hab+Neg+Prs: isdägangqanggan
     isdä+V+Hab+Neg+Prt: isdägangqangang
     isdä+V+Hab+Neg+Fut: isdägangqangsaang
     isdä+V+Neg+Prs: isdäqanggan
     isdä+V+Neg+Prt: isdäqangang
     isdä+V+Neg+Fut: isdäqangsaang
     isdä+V+Hab+Prs: isdäganggan
     isdä+V+Hab+Prt: isdägangang
     isdä+V+Hab+Fut: isdägangsaang
     isdä+V+Hab+Neg+Prs: isdägangqanggan
     isdä+V+Hab+Neg+Prt: isdägangqangang
     isdä+V+Hab+Neg+Fut: isdägangqangsaang
